Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.780

Supported employment—Impact on other employment positions.

The creation of supported employment positions under RCW 41.04.760 and 41.04.770 shall not count against an agency's allotted full-time equivalent employee positions. Supported employment programs are not intended to displace employees or abrogate any reduction-in-force rights.

[ 1997 c 287 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—1997 c 287: See note following RCW 41.04.750.